cv_RU/cv_RU.aff
SFX B ӗ кӗмӗршӗн/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]кӗ
SFX B ӗ лӗмӗршӗн/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]лӗ
SFX B ӗ мӗмӗршӗн/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]мӗ
SFX B ӗ нӗмӗршӗн/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]нӗ
SFX B ӗ пӗмӗршӗн/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]пӗ
SFX B ӗ рӗмӗршӗн/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]рӗ
SFX B ӗ сӗмӗршӗн/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]сӗ
SFX B ӗ ӗмӗршӗн/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]ҫӗ
SFX B ӗ тӗмӗршӗн/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]тӗ
SFX B ӗ хӗмӗршӗн/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]хӗ
SFX B ӗ чӗмӗршӗн/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]чӗ
SFX B ӗ шӗмӗршӗн/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]шӗ
SFX B 0 мшӗн/RT [^аеиуӗӑӳэюя][вклмнпрсҫтхчш]ӗ
SFX B 0 мӗршӗн/RT [^аеиуӗӑӳэюя][вклмнпрсҫтхчш]ӗ
SFX B 0 йӗмшӗн/RT и
SFX B 0 йӗмӗршӗн/RT и
SFX B 0 ӳшӗн/RT [^еӗиӳ]
SFX B 0 ӗршӗн/RT [^еӗиӳ]
SFX B е ӳшӗн/RT е
SFX B е ӗршӗн/RT е
SFX B ӳ ӗвӳшӗн/RT ӳ
SFX B ӳ ӗвӗршӗн/RT ӳ
SFX B ӗ вӳшӗн/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]вӗ
SFX B ӗ кӳшӗн/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]кӗ
SFX B ӗ лӳшӗн/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]лӗ
SFX B ӗ мӳшӗн/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]мӗ
SFX B ӗ нӳшӗн/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]нӗ
SFX B ӗ пӳшӗн/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]пӗ
SFX B ӗ рӳшӗн/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]рӗ
SFX B ӗ сӳшӗн/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]сӗ
SFX B ӗ ӳшӗн/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]ҫӗ
SFX B ӗ тӳшӗн/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]тӗ
SFX B ӗ хӳшӗн/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]хӗ
SFX B ӗ чӳшӗн/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]чӗ
SFX B ӗ шӳшӗн/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]шӗ
SFX B ӗ вӗршӗн/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]вӗ
SFX B ӗ кӗршӗн/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]кӗ
SFX B ӗ лӗршӗн/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]лӗ
SFX B ӗ мӗршӗн/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]мӗ
SFX B ӗ нӗршӗн/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]нӗ
SFX B ӗ пӗршӗн/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]пӗ
SFX B ӗ рӗршӗн/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]рӗ
SFX B ӗ сӗршӗн/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]сӗ
SFX B ӗ ӗршӗн/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]ҫӗ
SFX B ӗ тӗршӗн/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]тӗ
SFX B ӗ хӗршӗн/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]хӗ
SFX B ӗ чӗршӗн/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]чӗ
SFX B ӗ шӗршӗн/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]шӗ
SFX B ӗ ӳшӗн/RT [^аеиуӗӑӳэюя][вклмнпрсҫтхчш]ӗ
SFX B 0 ршӗн/RT [^аеиуӗӑӳэюя][вклмнпрсҫтхчш]ӗ
SFX B 0 йӳшӗн/RT и
SFX B 0 йӗршӗн/RT и
SFX B 0 ӗшӗн/RT [^еӗиӳт]
SFX B т чӗшӗн/RT т
SFX B е ишӗн/RT е
SFX B ӳ ӗвӗшӗн/RT ӳ
SFX B ӗ вишӗн/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]вӗ
SFX B ӗ кишӗн/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]кӗ
SFX B ӗ лишӗн/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]лӗ
SFX B ӗ мишӗн/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]мӗ
SFX B ӗ нишӗн/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]нӗ
SFX B ӗ пишӗн/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]пӗ
SFX B ӗ ришӗн/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]рӗ
SFX B ӗ сишӗн/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]сӗ
SFX B ӗ ишӗн/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]ҫӗ
SFX B ӗ тишӗн/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]тӗ
SFX B ӗ хишӗн/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]хӗ
SFX B ӗ чишӗн/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]чӗ
SFX B ӗ шишӗн/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]шӗ
SFX B ӗ ишӗн/RT [^аеиуӗӑӳэюя][вклмнпрсҫтхчш]ӗ
SFX B 0 йӗшӗн/RT и

SFX C N 6
SFX C 0 ех [^е]
SFX C 0 х е
SFX C 0 рех .
SFX C 0 рехчӗ .
SFX C 0 терех .
SFX C 0 терехчӗ .

SFX D Y 12
SFX D 0 а .
SFX D 0 сӑр .
SFX D 0 шӑн .
SFX D 0 ӑн .
SFX D 0 ӑнскер .
SFX D 0 ӑнни .
SFX D 0 шӑнскер .
SFX D 0 ӑн .
SFX D 0 ра .
SFX D 0 ран .
SFX D 0 па .
SFX D 0 пала .

SFX E Y 19
SFX E 0 скер .
SFX E 0 скерех .
SFX E 0 скерччӗ .
SFX E 0 рах [^р]
SFX E 0 рахчӗ [^р]
SFX E 0 ах р
SFX E 0 ахчӗ р
SFX E 0 тарах .
SFX E 0 тарахчӗ .
SFX E 0 ччӗ [вйлмнр]
SFX E 0 чӗ [кпсҫтхчш]
SFX E 0 ччӗ [вйлмнр][еиӗӳ]
SFX E 0 чӗ [^аеиуӗӑӳэюя][кпсҫтхчш][ауӑюя]
SFX E 0 ччӗ [аеиуӗӑӳэюя][кпсҫтхчш][ауӑюя]
SFX E 0 ах [^аӑ]
SFX E 0 х а
SFX E ӑ ах ӑ
SFX E 0 ӑн [^ӑа]
SFX E 0 ки к

SFX F Y 19
SFX F 0 скер .
SFX F 0 скерех .
SFX F 0 скерччӗ .
SFX F 0 рех [^р]
SFX F 0 рехчӗ [^р]
SFX F 0 ех р
SFX F 0 ехчӗ р
SFX F 0 терех .
SFX F 0 терехчӗ .
SFX F 0 ччӗ [вйлмнр]
SFX F 0 чӗ [кпсҫтхчш]
SFX F 0 ччӗ [вйлмнр][еиӗӳ]
SFX F 0 чӗ [^аеиуӗӑӳэюя][кпсҫтхчш][еиӗӳ]
SFX F 0 ччӗ [аеиуӗӑӳэюя][кпсҫтхчш][еиӗӳ]
SFX F 0 ех [^еӗ]
SFX F 0 х е
SFX F ӗ ех ӗ
SFX F 0 ӗн [^еӗ]
SFX F 0 ки к
