cv_RU/cv_RU.dic
ҫемӗ/B
ҫийлӗ/F
ҫирӗппӗн/C
ҫитлӗ/F
ҫитлӗн/C
ҫурӑмлӑ/E
ҫурилле/C
ӑнӑҫуллӑ/E
ӑрӑмҫах/E
ӑруташлӑ/E
ӑста/AE
ӑшпиллӗн/C
ӗҫ/GB
ӗҫкӗлле/C
ӗҫлӗ/F
ӗҫлӗн/C
ӗҫлӗхлӗн/C
ӗлӗшлӗ/F
ӗмӗр/B
ӗмӗтлӗн/C
ӗмӗтленӳллӗ/F
ӗмпӳлле/C
ӗнӗлле/CG
ӗнелле/C
ӗненмелле/C
ӗнентерӳллӗ/F
ӗнентерӳллӗн/C
ӗненчӗклӗн/C
ӗненӳллӗн/C
ӗненӳсӗрлӗх/B
ӗненӳсӗррӗн/C
ӗнерсӗр/FB
ӗнчӗр/F
ӗрескел/F
ӗретлӗн/C
ӗретрен/C
ӗретсӗр/F
ӗрехетлӗн/C
ӗртӗ/B
ӗсӗксӗр/F
ӗшеннӗн/C
ӗшенчӗклӗн/C
Ази/B
Англи/B
Бавари/B
Валерий/B
Галиси/B
Еккер/B
Еремей/B
Запорожье/B
Илсӗвер/B
Иревли/B
Йӑвантей/B
Кӗччи/B
Катарин/B
Куракки/B
Мӗслӗм/B
Матӗне/B
Месопотами/B
Михӗпер/B
Назрань/B
Пайкӗлти/B
Пенсильвани/B
Пинекей/B
Питрек/B
Причерноморье/B
Сӗверне/B
Савканеш/B
Сали/B
Сахвантер/B
Сенкепи/B
Сертепи/B
Силментей/B
Синчевер/B
Суркки/B
Тасмани/B
Тимӗр/B
Туймек/B
Тушкилт/B
Унихер/B
Ухтирек/B
Хаҫҫипе/B
Хуньтирек/B
Шенерпи/B
Шомик/B
Элмет/B
Эрнеспи/B
Япони/B
абажурлӑ/E
авӑнчӑклӑ/E
авалхи/F
авалхилле/C
августчен/C
автоинспекци/B
автоллӑ/E
авторитетлӑ/E
агглютинацилӗ/F
адекватлӑ/E
адыгелле/C
айлӑ/E
академилле/C
акварельлӗ/F
аккумуляци/B
алӑклӑ/E
аллегорилле/CG
алпастӑ/E
алсишлӗ/F
алтивӗҫҫӗн/C
алччамуй/E
амортизаци/B
аналогилле/C
анемиллӗ/F
анкерлӑ/E
антеннӑллӑ/E
антропометри/B
априориллӗ/F
априорлӑ/E
аптӑрашкилле/C
арҫурилле/CG
аристократилле/C
арккӑллӑ/E
асӑрхавлӑ/E
асаилӳ/B
аслатиллӗ/F
аслатилле/C
ассимиляцилле/CG
астаруллӑ/E
атомлӑ/E
аттесӗр/B
ахалӗн/C
ахаллӗн/C
ахальлӗн/C
ахальтен/C
ахальшӗн/C
ашӑклӑ/E
бактериле/CG
бактериллӗ/F
баржӑллӑ/E
биостанци/B
биссектрисӑллӑ/E
булавкӑллӑ/E
бюллетеньлӗ/F
вӑйпиттилен/C
вӑлчаллӑ/E
вӑтанӑҫлӑ/E
вӗҫев/B
вӗҫкӗнӗн/C
вӗҫкӗнчӗкле/C
вӗлересле/C
вӗлтӗркке/F
вӗрентекен/B
вӗри/F
вӗрилле/C
вӗтӗрмӗш/F
вӗтлӗх/B
вӗчӗллӗ/F
вӗчӗрхенӳллӗн/C
вӗчӗх/FG
ванильлӗ/F
вариантлӑ/E
варинкке/B
вашӑк/E
вертикаллӗ/F
виҫҫӗлӗх/B
виҫӗмлӗ/F
виҫеллӗн/C
вилӗмле/C
винаватлӑ/E
вирелле/C
вирлӗх/B
виртлӗ/F
витӗмлӗн/C
витлевлӗ/F
витлевлӗн/C
включатель/B
вуальлӗ/F
вуншарлӑ/E
выльӑхлӑ/E
газогенераторлӑ/E
галлюцинаци/B
гарантиллӗ/F
гидромелиораци/B
горизонтальлӗ/F
гуашь/B
гусеницӑллӑ/E
двигательлӗ/F
декларациллӗ/F
делопроизводитель/B
демократилле/C
детальлӗ/F
диверси/B
дидактикӑллӑ/E
дифференциаллӑ/E
довольстви/B
дополнениллӗ/F
евӗклӗн/C
евӗрлӗн/C
евитлӗ/F
ейкеленчӗк/B
елехей/F
енерлӗ/F
ерҫӳсӗр/F
ерипен/C
ермек/B
ешӗлле/C
жанрлӑ/E
заглавиллӗ/F
закрепитель/B
идиомӑллӑ/E
иждивенилӗх/B
ииструкциллӗ/F
икӗпитлӗн/C
иккӗленӳллӗн/C
иккӗллӗ/F
иккӗмӗшле/C
икшерӗн/C
илекен/B
илемсӗррӗн/C
иллюзиллӗ/F
именчӗклӗ/F
именчӗклӗн/C
иммиграци/B
имсӗр/F
имшеррӗн/C
инверсиллӗ/F
инкеклӗ/F
инкрустаци/B
интернационаллӑ/E
информациллӗ/F
ип/B
ирҫелле/C
ирӗклӗ/F
ирӗклӗн/C
ирӗксӗррӗн/C
ирӗксӗртереххӗн/C
ирсӗрле/CG
ирхи/F
искусствоведени/B
историлле/C
ишлӗ/F
йӑлӑнуллӑ/E
йӑлтӑркка/AE
йӑмшаклӑ/E
йӑплака/E
йӑркка/E
йӑшӑк/E
йӗк/B
йӗкӗлтевлӗн/C
йӗкӗр/F
йӗкер/F
йӗлтӗрлӗ/F
йӗмпӗлти/B
йӗнерлӗ/F
йӗплӗ/F
йӗрӗлчеллӗ/F
йӗрӗнчӗклӗн/C
йӗре/F
йӗркеленӳ/B
йӗркеллӗн/C
йӗрлешӳллӗ/F
йодлӑ/E
йунеҫӳллӗ/F
йӳҫӗлле/C
йӳҫеллӗ/F
йӳлер/B
йӳлерӗн/C
йӳнӗ/F
йӳнсӗр/F
кӑвӑрчлӑ/E
кӑкӑрлӑ/E
кӑмӑркка/E
кӑнӑҫсӑр/E
кӑпӑшка/E
кӑптӑрти/F
кӑптака/E
кӑрачӑ/E
кӑтӑксӑр/E
кӑчӑклӑ/E
кӗҫҫе/B
кӗҫӗн/F
кӗвҫӗк/F
кӗвӗллӗ/F
кӗвсӗр/F
кӗлет/B
кӗлеткеллӗ/F
кӗлтеллӗ/F
кӗмӗлӗн/C
кӗнекеллӗ/F
кӗпӗрне/B
кӗперлӗ/F
кӗрӗкле/CG
кӗреҫеллӗ/F
кӗрен/F
кӗресле/B
кӗреттӗн/C
кӗрешӳллӗ/F
кӗрнек/F
кӗрпеллӗ/F
кӗрхилле/C
кӗрӳ/B
кӗсенлӗ/F
кӗсменлӗ/F
кӗтевлӗн/C
кӗтес/B
кӗтеслӗ/F
кӗтӳлле/C
каҫӑллӑ/E
кавернӑллӑ/E
кавирлӗ/F
кадми/B
какрака/E
калиллӗ/E
камели/B
камерӑллӑ/E
камитле/CG
канализациллӗ/F
канашлӑ/E
канлӗхлӗ/F
кансӗррӗн/C
капӑртмаллӑ/E
каптӑрмаллӑ/E
карамель/B
караслӑ/E
кармуньлӗ/F
карнислӑ/E
картофелекопательлӗ/F
карчамас/E
катемпилле/C
катен/F
катодлӑ/E
кафетери/B
качаллӑ/E
каштӑркка/E
кервен/F
кивӗлле/C
килӗллӗ/F
килӗшлӗх/B
киллӗ/F
километрлӑ/E
кинемей/B
кипкеллӗ/F
киревсӗррӗн/C
киресӗр/F
кирпет/B
кичемлӗ/F
клеш/B
коктейльлӗ/F
коллективлӑ/E
коми/B
комилле/C
коммуникациллӗ/F
комплекслӑ/E
консерваци/B
конспирациллӗ/F
контрастлӑ/E
контрольлӗ/F
концепци/B
конькиллӗ/F
краҫҫынлӑ/E
кремаци/B
крыльцаллӑ/E
куҫкӗрет/F
кукӑрлӑ/E
куклетмӗш/F
культиваци/B
кулянуллӑ/E
купарчаллӑ/E
курӑнуллӑ/E
курпунлӑ/E
кутӑркаллӑ/E
кӳлӗллӗ/F
кӳлев/B
кӳлешӳллӗ/F
кӳмертен/F
кӳптӗрмеллӗ/F
кӳренчӗклӗ/F
кӳренчӗклӗн/C
кӳслемкке/F
лӑймаллӑ/E
лӑкӑрти/B
лӑп/E
лӑпсака/E
лӗмсӗр/F
лӗпӗллӗ/F
лӗпрешке/F
лӗркке/F
лавккаллӑ/E
лакейле/CG
лампӑллӑ/E
лань/B
лапӑрчӑк/AE
лапчӑк/E
латлӑ/E
латтисӗр/F
лашаллӑ/E
лени/B
ленче/F
лерелле/C
лечӗркке/F
ликёрлӑ/E
логикӑсӑр/E
локомобиль/B
лӳппер/F
лӳпперрӗн/C
мӑйлӑ/E
мӑнаҫлӑ/E
мӑшӑк/E
мӗлкев/B
мӗлкеллӗ/F
мӗскерле/C
мажорлӑ/E
малашнехи/C
маляриллӗ/F
мамӑклӑ/E
ман/HD
манерсӗр/B
марилле/C
маршрутлӑ/E
медресе/B
междометилле/CG
меллӗн/C
мелодрамӑллӑ/E
мереккеллӗ/F
мерешке/B
мерченле/CG
мехеллӗ/F
мечӗкле/CG
миграци/B
миллиметрлӑ/E
минтев/B
минутсерен/C
мифологилле/CG
мобильлӗ/F
мозаикӑллӑ/E
моногамиллӗ/F
монополи/B
мурлӑ/E
нӑйӑлти/B
нӑйкӑшуллӑ/E
нӗрлӗ/F
нӗрсӗррӗн/C
натурӑллӑ/E
национализаци/B
невралгиллӗ/F
нефтьлӗ/F
нимӗҫле/C
ниме/B
нимскерле/C
нумай/E
нӳрӗ/F
обструкци/B
оптимизмлӑ/E
организацилле/C
ортопеди/B
ответлӑ/E
пӑлхануллӑ/E
пӑтравлӑ/E
пӑчӑр/AE
пӗвеленчӗк/B
пӗкрӗк/F
пӗлӳллӗ/F
пӗрӗлчӗк/B
пӗрешкелле/C
пӗркеленчӗклӗ/F
пӗрмече/B
пӗрмечеллӗ/F
пӗрпеккӗн/C
пӗрчӗллӗ/F
пӗтӗлле/CG
пӗтев/B
пӗччен/F
пайӑркаллӑ/E
палт/E
параллеллӗ/F
параллеллӗх/B
парка/E
пародилле/C
патриотизмлӑ/E
педиатри/B
перекетлӗ/F
петици/B
пикенчӗклӗ/F
пил/B
пиллӗн/C
пиллӗхлӗ/F
пиншерӗн/C
пирчеклӗ/F
питӗлӗх/B
плӗнкӑллӑ/E
плиталлӑ/E
полигами/B
полировкӑллӑ/E
полномочиллӗ/F
потенциллӗ/F
поэзи/B
призлӑ/E
приключениллӗ/F
причасти/B
проблемӑллӑ/E
профиллӗ/F
психиатри/B
пуҫаналлӑ/E
пуканелле/C
пултаруллӑ/E
пуплев/B
путам/E
путлӗн/C
пыйтӑллӑ/E
пӳклем/B
пӳлӗмлӗ/F
пӳрнеллӗ/F
пӳске/B
разрядлӑ/E
рапсоди/B
реакциллӗ/F
ревматизмлӑ/E
революцилле/C
редколлеги/B
рекордлӑ/E
ременьлӗ/F
репараци/B
рехетлӗ/F
речитативлӑ/E
рупи/B
сӑвайлӑ/E
сӑнарлӑ/E
сӑрлӑ/E
сӗвемлӗ/F
сӗлтӗллӗ/F
сӗмсӗрле/CG
сӗрен/FB
сӗрлӗ/F
сӗтеклӗн/C
савӑнӑҫлӑ/E
саккунлӑ/E
самодержавиллӗ/F
самообслужнвани/B
сан/D
санкциле/C
санлӑ/E
сарлака/E
сегментлӑ/E
селӗммӗн/C
селенологи/B
сенкер/F
сехӗрленӳ/B
сивӗлле/C
сиввӗн/C
сивлек/FB
сиктерчӗк/B
сикчӗллӗн/C
сикчевлӗ/F
симптомлӑ/E
симфонилле/C
синоними/B
сиплӗ/F
сиропла/C
сисӗнмелле/C
скарлатинӑллӑ/E
славяноведени/B
снайперлӑ/E
спекуляциле/CG
специализаци/B
спираллӗ/F
сроклӑ/E
старикле/CG
стоматологи/B
субподрядлӑ/E
сулӑнкӑ/E
сульфамидлӑ/E
сурхури/B
сусӑр/E
сывлӑхлӑ/E
сюжетлӑ/E
сӳнӗк/F
сӳптеркке/B
сӳрӗккӗн/C
тӑкӑс/E
тӑматлӑ/E
тӑпраллӑ/E
тӑршшӗ/B
тӑсмака/E
тӗксӗм/F
тӗксӗммӗн/C
тӗлӗнтермӗшле/C
тӗллӗн/C
тӗллевсӗрлӗх/B
тӗнккевлӗ/F
тӗпӗртетӳ/B
тӗплӗн/C
тӗпренчӗкӗн/C
тӗрӗслетӳ/B
тӗрӗссӗн/C
тӗреклӗ/F
тӗрмеҫӗ/B
тӗслӗн/C
тӗслӗхлӗ/F
тӗтреллӗн/C
тӗттӗммӗн/C
таити/B
такӑр/E
танлаштаруллӑ/E
тачӑ/E
теветлӗ/F
телейлӗх/B
темӗскерле/C
термен/B
тертлӗн/CG
технологиллӗ/F
тивлетлӗн/C
тивлетсӗр/B
тимлӗ/F
тимлӗн/C
тинӗс/B
тинкерӳллӗн/C
типпӗн/C
типшӗм/F
тирек/B
тиркевлӗн/C
тирпейсӗррӗн/C
тислӗклӗ/F
тишкерӳллӗн/C
торфлӑ/E
трагедилӗх/B
тувалла/C
туллӑ/E
турилкке/B
туртуллӑ/E
тытамаклӑ/E
тӳлеккӗн/C
тӳлеклӗ/F
тӳнтеррӗн/C
тӳпе/B
тӳрӗрен/C
тӳрккессӗн/C
тӳрремӗн/C
тӳртен/C
тӳсӗмлӗ/F
тӳсӗмсӗррӗн/C
тӳтел/B
улан/E
унчченхилле/C
упӑте/B
усӑк/E
учреждени/B
факсимиле/CG
фантазиле/HC
фашизмлӑ/E
философиллӗ/F
фотолаборатори/B
фракцилле/CG
хӑвӑртлӑхлӑ/E
хӑрӑмлӑ/E
хӗвеллӗн/C
хӗвелччен/C
хӗлхемлӗн/C
хӗмлӗ/F
хӗпӗртӳллӗн/C
хӗрлӗх/B
хӗрле/C
хӗрли/F
хӗрхенӳллӗн/C
хаклӑ/E
халиччен/C
халлӗн/C
хатӗр/FB
хиклет/B
химилле/C
хирӗҫле/CG
хитре/F
хордӑллӑ/E
хресченле/CG
хуплашкаллӑ/E
хухӑр/E
хыҫӗнчи/C
хӳтӗлев/B
цианлӑ/E
чӑппи/F
чӑтаймасӑр/E
чӗлпӗк/B
чӗрӗпле/C
чӗреллӗ/F
чӗрпӗк/B
чаруллӑ/E
чеелле/C
ченчешке/F
чечекленӳ/B
чиперрӗн/C
чирлешке/F
шӑвӑҫлӑ/E
шӑлйӗрен/B
шӑнкӑравлӑ/E
шӑтӑркка/E
шӗвилкке/F
шанӑҫлӑ/E
шатунлӑ/E
шепӗр/F
шеппӗн/C
шересӗр/B
шиклевлӗн/C
шикленӳллӗн/C
шитлӗ/F
штыклӑ/E
шурлӑ/E
шӳтлӗн/C
ыйтуллӑ/E
ырашпӑтри/B
ытарлӑ/E
ытахальтен/C
эволюцилле/C
экзогамиллӗ/F
элес/B
эмульсиллӗ/F
энче/E
эреветлӗн/C
эрнелӗх/B
эрнесерен/C
этемле/CG
юпаллӑ/E
яваплӑ/E
яланхи/F
янкӑр/E
ятарлӑ/E
ӳкӗтсӗр/B
ӳлӗмрен/C
ӳпкевлӗн/C
ӳре/F
ӳреккӗн/C
ӳркенӗҫлӗн/C
ӳхӗ/B
